New York, session 2025-2026, S1408.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 305 of the education law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 63 to read as follows: 3 63. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, and 4 subject to an appropriation, the department shall contract with an 5 outside entity who has expertise in the prevention of anti-Semitism, 6 Islamophobia bias and discrimination based on religion, race, sexual 7 orientation or gender identity or expression to establish an anti-Semi- 8 tism, Islamophobia bias and discrimination prevention and education 9 program overseen by such department. The commissioner shall work with 10 such outside entity, to establish and develop an educational program 11 within such department related to the prevention of anti-Semitism, 12 Islamophobia bias and discrimination based on religion, race, sexual 13 orientation or gender identity or expression in grades kindergarten 14 through twelve. Such program shall be further defined by such commis- 15 sioner in regulation and shall be designed to educate students, parents 16 and school personnel about the prevention of anti-Semitism, Islamophobia 17 bias and discrimination based on religion, race, sexual orientation or 18 gender identity or expression. Such commissioner, in collaboration with 19 any other stakeholder groups deemed appropriate by such commissioner, 20 shall develop: 21 a. the anti-Semitism, Islamophobia bias and discrimination prevention 22 and education program prepared by an outside expert organization into EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02492-01-5 S. 1408 2 1 age-appropriate model curriculum resources, including exemplar lesson 2 plans, and best practice instructional resources for students, parents 3 and school personnel designed to prevent anti-Semitism, Islamophobia 4 bias and discrimination based on religion, race, sexual orientation or 5 gender identity or expression. Such model curriculum, resources, lesson 6 plans and instructional resources shall include but not be limited to 7 guidelines and methods of prevention, indicators and warning signs of 8 anti-Semitism, Islamophobia bias and discrimination based on religion, 9 race, sexual orientation or gender identity or expression, guidelines 10 and methods to prevent anti-Semitism, Islamophobia bias and discrimi- 11 nation based on religion, race, sexual orientation or gender identity or 12 expression and how to report complaints of anti-Semitism, Islamophobia 13 bias and discrimination based on religion, race, sexual orientation or 14 gender identity or expression. Such model curriculum shall be made 15 available to school boards, school superintendents, their equivalents, 16 and teachers for voluntary implementation in social studies classes and 17 in social studies coursework; 18 b. instructional tools and materials for students, parents and school 19 personnel, which shall include updated information on how to report 20 incidents of anti-Semitism, Islamophobia bias and discrimination based 21 on religion, race, sexual orientation or gender identity or expression, 22 with a review of such information to occur periodically, at intervals 23 deemed appropriate by such commissioner; and 24 c. public availability of all materials related to the anti-Semitism, 25 Islamophobia bias and discrimination prevention and education program on 26 such department's website in Spanish, Creole, Mandarin, Korean, Bengali 27 and any other language predominantly spoken by the population of the 28 state. 29 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of July next succeeding 30 the date on which it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the 31 addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary 32 for the implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized 33 to be made and completed on or before such effective date.